Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-109
Contracts for payment of money or indebtedness; when usurious.

Any contract for the payment of money in satisfaction of indebtedness which seeks, directly or indirectly, to prevent the debtor from discharging his obligation in full in any lawful money of the United States with the same number of dollars he originally contracted to pay, plus interest not in excess of the maximum legal contract rate, is hereby declared to constitute usury, the same as if the contract sought to bind the debtor to pay more than the maximum legal rate of interest.

Laws 1935, c. 126, § 1, p. 452;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 45-128;

R.S.1943, § 45-109.